Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 15. Foreign Corporations

Cross references. —

As to foreign railroad or telegraph company having agent for service of process, see art. 10, § 18, Wyo. Const.

As to actions against foreign corporations, see §

1-5-107

.

As to notice and filing requirements of an out-of-state bank that will be the resulting bank pursuant to an interstate merger, see §

13-2-805

.

As to application and fees for a company that proposes to acquire a Wyoming bank or Wyoming bank holding company, see §

13-9-309

.

As to qualification of new foreign insurer, see §

26-3-105

.

As to general corporation laws not applying to foreign insurers, see §

26-3-119

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

36 Am. Jur. 2d Foreign Corporations § 1 et seq.

Jurisdiction of action or proceeding involving internal affairs of foreign corporation, 72 ALR2d 1211.

Foreign corporation's access to courts, 90 ALR3d 937.

Personal liability of stockholder, officer or agent for debt of foreign corporation doing business in the state, 27 ALR4th 387.

19 C.J.S. Corporations §§ 883 to 962.